Utah statutes.
30-3-11.1.   Family Court Act -- Purpose.
It is the public policy of the state of Utah to strengthen the family life
foundation of our society and reduce the social and economic costs to the
state resulting from broken homes and to take reasonable measures to preserve
marriages, particularly where minor children are involved. The purposes of
this act are to protect the rights of children and to promote the public
welfare by preserving and protecting family life and the institution of
matrimony by providing the courts with further assistance for family
counseling, the reconciliation of spouses and the amicable settlement of
domestic and family controversies.
